Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.140

Rule-making authority.

The department shall have such rule-making authority as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1995 c 399 s 18; 1988 c 124 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.